Idaho, session 2025, H0333.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Board of Education and the Board
of Regents of the University of Idaho for Health Education Programs, the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL BENEFIT
COSTS PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. BOISE INTERNAL MEDICINE:
FROM:
General
Fund $60,000 $60,000
II. EASTERN IDAHO MED RESIDENCIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $240,000 $240,000
III. FAMILY MEDICINE RESIDENCIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $120,500 $420,000 $540,500


FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL BENEFIT
COSTS PAYMENTS TOTAL
IV. IDAHO DENTAL EDUCATION PROGRAM:
FROM:
General
Fund $54,000 $54,000
V. UNIVERSITY OF UTAH MEDICAL EDUCATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $60,000 $60,000
GRAND TOTAL $120,500 $834,000 $954,500
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the State Board of Education and the Board of Regents of the University of
Idaho for Health Education Programs is hereby increased by two (2.00) for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. PRIORITIZING AND REPORTING ON PROGRESS IN WOMEN'S HEALTH.
The Idaho Graduate Medical Education Committee shall immediately prioritize
obstetrics and gynecology (OB/GYN) fellowships in its overall preparation
and training of family medicine residents. The Idaho Graduate Medical Edu-
cation Committee shall provide a written report to the Joint Finance-Appro-
priations Committee detailing progress towards this goal by October 1, 2025.
The format and content of this report will be determined in consultation with
the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 4. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.